Illinois, session 104th, HB3868.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Sec. 5. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as may be 5necessary, is appropriated from the Build Illinois Bond Fund 6to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 7grant to Sinnissippi Centers for costs associated with capital 8improvements. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.